Massachusetts, session 194th, S2179.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Chapter 195 of the acts of 2014 is hereby amended by inserting after section 3 the 
following section: 
“SECTION 3A.  (a) Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the 
Authority shall issue a request for proposals to sell, license, or lease naming or sponsorship 
rights, including but not limited to, whole building naming rights for all buildings, facilities, 
parking garages, function rooms and public areas or other assets owned by the Authority to 
maximize revenue available for tourism and cultural programming in the commonwealth.  
Nothing in this section shall require the Authority to issue a request for proposals for any 
buildings, facilities, parking garages, function rooms, public areas, or other assets previously 

of 2 10 named or already under a licensing, rental, or sponsorship agreement as of December 31, 2024, 
unless said naming or sponsorship opportunity is located within a previously named asset. 
(b) The executive director shall direct all revenues generated by the Authority under this 
section to be split evenly between the Massachusetts Tourism Trust Fund under section 13T of 
chapter 23A and the Massachusetts Cultural Facilities Fund under section 42 of chapter 23G.  
(c) All requests for proposals issued pursuant to this section shall be held open for a 
minimum of 120 days.”. 
SECTION 2.  The Authority shall issue the request for proposals pursuant to this act 
within 180 days following enactment and shall issue subsequent proposals as it deems necessary 
to maximize revenue in accordance with section 1.